Washington statutes.
RCW 36.27.100

Statewide drug prosecution assistance program—Created.

The legislature recognizes that, due to the magnitude or volume of offenses in a given area of the state, there is a recurring need for supplemental assistance in the prosecuting of drug and drug-related offenses that can be directed to the area of the state with the greatest need for short-term assistance. A statewide drug prosecution assistance program is created within the criminal justice training commission to assist county prosecuting attorneys in the prosecution of drug and drug-related offenses.

[ 2010 c 271 s 501; 1995 c 399 s 41; 1989 c 271 s 236.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2010 c 271: See notes following RCW 43.330.005.

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.